Utah statutes.
78B-4-305.   Stay pending motion to dismiss.

(1)  In any action commenced under the provisions of Subsection 78B-4-303(2), all discovery and other proceedings shall be stayed during the pendency of any motion to dismiss unless the court finds upon the motion of any party that particularized discovery is necessary to preserve evidence or to prevent undue prejudice to a party.

(2)  During the pendency of any stay of discovery pursuant to this section, unless otherwise ordered by the court, any party to the action with actual notice of the allegations contained in the complaint shall treat all documents, data compilations, and tangible objects that are in the custody or control of the party and are relevant to the allegations, as if they were the subject of a continuing request for production from an opposing party under Rule 34, URCP.

